California, session 20252026, AB2332.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Article 6 (commencing with Section 52205) is added to Chapter 7 of Part 28 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code, to read: Article 6. Dual Language Immersion Coordinator52205. For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:(a) “Dual language immersion program” means a program that enrolls both English learners and native speakers of English and provides integrated language learning and academic instruction for native speakers of English and native speakers of another language, with the goals of high academic achievement, first and second language proficiency, and cross-cultural understanding.(b) “Local educational agency” means a school district, charter school, county office of education, or regional occupational center or program operated by a joint powers authority or county office of education.(c) “Partner language” means a language other than English that is used to provide instruction to pupils in a dual language immersion program.52206. The department, on or before July 1, 2027, shall designate a Dual Language Immersion Coordinator to provide coordination between local educational agencies to share resources and knowledge on dual language immersion programs.52207. The Dual Language Immersion Coordinator shall do all of the following:(a) Act as the point of contact within the department for local educational agencies seeking to establish new or expand existing dual language immersion programs.(b) Facilitate ongoing communication and collaboration between local educational agencies to share resources and best practices on dual language immersion programs.(c) Establish, publish, and maintain on the department’s internet website, on or before January 1, 2028, a directory of operative dual language immersion programs, which shall include all of the following:(1) The local educational agency and schoolsites that have operative dual language immersion programs.(2) The partner languages offered at each schoolsite, the program model, and a point of contact for the program.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.___________________ REVISIONS: Heading–Line 3.___________________